Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1240
Interpretation of Small Wireless Facilities Deployment Act; limitations.

Nothing in the Small Wireless Facilities Deployment Act shall be interpreted to allow any entity to provide services regulated under 47 U.S.C. 521 to 573, as such sections existed on January 1, 2019, without compliance with all laws applicable to providers of such services. The Small Wireless Facilities Deployment Act shall not be interpreted to impose any new requirements on cable operators for the provision of cable service in this state.

Laws 2019, LB184, § 40.